District of Columbia statutes.
34-609

Method of review exclusive.

The method of review of the orders and decisions of the Commission provided by §§ 34-604 to 34-608, herein, shall be exclusive.

Mar. 4, 1913, ch. 150, § 8, par. 69a
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 884, ch. 742, § 2
Former § 43-910 1981 Ed., 49 Stat. 885, ch. 742, § 4, provided that if any provision this section or the application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity of the remainder of said sections and of the application of such provision to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.
1973 Ed., § 43-710.
1981 Ed., § 43-909.